Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4075.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Water Resources
Board from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the Statewide

Recovery Fund established in Section 255 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, the sum of Twenty-five Million Nine Hundred Ninety-eight
Thousand Seven Hundred Ninety-eight Dollars ($25,998,798.00) or so
much thereof as may be necessary to complete ongoing projects that
have received prior appropriations from the Statewide Recovery Fund
or to target statewide strategic water infrastructure projects.
Such funds shall be utilized in a manner consistent with the
recommendations adopted by the Joint Committee on Pandemic Relief
Funding on April 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
Of the funds appropriated to the Oklahoma Water Resources Board
pursuant to:
1. Enrolled Senate Bill No. 429 of the 2nd Regular Session of
the 58th Oklahoma Legislature;
2. Enrolled Senate Bill No. 42 of the 2nd Regular Session of
the 58th Oklahoma Legislature;
3. Enrolled Senate Bill No. 4 of the 2nd Extraordinary Session
of the 58th Oklahoma Legislature;
4. Enrolled Senate Bill No. 13 of the 2nd Extraordinary Session
of the 58th Oklahoma Legislature;
5. Enrolled House Bill No. 2942 of the 1st Regular Session of
the 59th Oklahoma Legislature;
6. Enrolled House Bill No. 2937 of the 2nd Regular Session of
the 59th Oklahoma Legislature; and
7. Enrolled House Bill No. 2789 of the 1st Regular Session of
the 60th Oklahoma Legislature,
the Oklahoma Water Resources Board is hereby authorized to transfer
and allocate amounts between such projects as needed in order to
complete any such project and purpose listed in measures described
in paragraphs 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, and 7 of this section.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
ENR. H. B. NO. 4075 Page 2

A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a Statewide
Recovery Special Account for the Oklahoma Water Resources Board for
each appropriation section of this act. The duration of such
accounts shall continue for the period of time that monies related
to the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 are being budgeted,
expended, or managed in the state. The ending of such period shall
be determined by the State Treasurer, and shall result in the
closing of such accounts as a matter of law. Such accounts shall be
continuing accounts as otherwise provided in this section, not
subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall exclusively consist of
monies related to the relevant appropriations made in this act and
as otherwise directed by law. All monies deposited to the credit of
such accounts are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and
expended by the Oklahoma Water Resources Board in accordance with
the provisions of this act. Expenditures from such accounts shall
be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims
filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
B. The Oklahoma Water Resources Board is authorized to request
in writing that the monies appropriated by the provisions of this
act be deposited or transferred to the accounts created pursuant to
subsection A of this section. No later than seven (7) calendar days
from the date of such request, the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services shall comply with such request
and verify to the requesting agency that such deposit or transfer
has been completed.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
The Oklahoma Water Resources Board may enter into memorandums of
understanding with other agencies of the State of Oklahoma for the
auditing, documentation, evaluation, implementation, oversight,
reporting, and management of funds and associated efforts related to
the appropriations made in this act; provided, that no such
memorandum of understanding shall require or include, as an option
or condition, the direct or practical transfer or relinquishment of
control by the agency appropriated such funds to budget, expend,
allocate, and request the distribution of the funds appropriated by
this act.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
ENR. H. B. NO. 4075 Page 3

The Oklahoma Water Resources Board may promulgate rules, utilize
existing rules, establish procedures, and utilize existing
procedures to implement the provisions of this act; provided, such
rules and procedures do not conflict with or impede the provisions
of this act.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
The Oklahoma Water Resources Board is authorized to enter into
contracts with financial institutions and execute such instruments
as may be necessary and convenient to hold and disseminate grant
funds in accordance with applicable federal and state regulations
and Board policies.
SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma Water Resources Board shall:
1. Submit to the Chairs of the Joint Committee on Pandemic
Relief Funding, or any successor Senate legislative or House of
Representatives legislative committee or joint committee, as
designated by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the
Speaker of the House of Representatives:
a. a written or electronic quarterly report detailing the
budgeting, expenditure, and management of all monies
appropriated in this act, and
b. a copy of all memorandums of understanding and
contracts with third parties entered into by the
Oklahoma Water Resources Board to facilitate, assist,
or administer powers and duties provided to the
Oklahoma Water Resources Board under the provisions of
this act; and
2. At the Joint Committee on Pandemic Relief Funding's request,
appear before the Joint Committee no later than six (6) months after
the effective date of this act, and as otherwise requested by the
Joint Committee to provide a status update regarding the
implementation of the provisions of this act.
B. The provisions of subsection A of this section shall remain
applicable for the period of time that monies appropriated under
ENR. H. B. NO. 4075 Page 4

this act are being budgeted, expended, or managed in the state. The
ending of such period shall be determined by the State Treasurer,
and shall be reported to the Governor, President Pro Tempore of the
Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives.
SECTION 8. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 4075 Page 5

Passed the House of Representatives the 21st day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 27th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 4075 Page 6